Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.020

Notice of sale—Personal property.

Before the sale of personal property under execution, order of sale or decree, notice thereof shall be given as follows:

(1) The judgment creditor shall, not less than thirty days prior to the day of sale, cause a copy of the notice of sale to be transmitted both by regular mail and by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the judgment debtor at the debtor's last known address, and by regular mail to the attorney of record for the judgment debtor, if any. The judgment creditor shall file an affidavit with the court showing compliance with the requirements of this subsection.

(2) The sheriff shall post typed or printed notice of the time and place of the sale in three public places in the county in which the sale is to take place, for a period of not less than four weeks prior to the day of sale.

[ 1988 c 231 s 14; 1987 c 442 s 602; 1984 c 276 s 1; 1981 c 329 s 1; 1935 c 35 s 1; RRS s 582. Prior: 1927 c 69 s 1; 1903 c 179 s 1; 1899 c 53 s 3; 1897 c 91 s 1. Formerly RCW 6.24.010.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Application—1984 c 276: "The 1984 amendments to RCW 6.04.100, 6.24.010, 6.24.015, 6.24.100, 6.24.140, 6.24.145, and 6.24.180 shall apply to all executions under chapter 6.24 RCW commenced after the effective date of this act [June 7, 1984]." [ 1984 c 276 s 8.]

Severability—1981 c 329: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 329 s 24.]